Hawaii statutes.
§121-21 Discharge. Discharges shall be
granted for the convenience of the State and for the same reasons and in like
manner as are from time to time prescribed by federal laws and regulations for
the army or air national guard. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-21]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next